Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2309
Satisfaction of costs; when.

In the event any person prosecutes or defends a case in forma pauperis successfully, any and all cost deferred by the court under sections 25-2301 to 25-2310 shall be first satisfied out of any money paid in satisfaction of judgment.

Laws 1972, LB 1120, § 9;

Laws 1999, LB 689, § 11.